Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB571.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 218B.010 is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Bona fide practitioner-patient relationship" means a treating or consulting
relationship, during the course of which a medicinal cannabis practitioner has:
(a) Completed an initial in-person examination and assessment of the patient's
medical history and current medical condition which shall include a review
of:
1. The patient's medical records for the previous twelve (12) months;
2. All other available medical records relevant to the patient's qualifying
medical condition;
3. Any medications that the patient is currently taking; and
4. Any other possible risks or side effects that may be associated with the
use of medicinal cannabis;
(b) Consulted with the patient with respect to the possible medical, therapeutic,
and palliative properties of medicinal cannabis;
(c) Advised the patient of the possible risks and side effects associated with the
use of medicinal cannabis, including possible interactions between medicinal
cannabis and any other drug or medication that the patient is taking at that
time; and
(d) Established an expectation that he or she will provide follow-up care and
treatment to the patient in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to KRS 218B.050(10);
(2) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(3) "Cannabis business" means an entity licensed under this chapter as a cultivator,
dispensary, processor, producer, or safety compliance facility;
Page 1 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
(4) "Cannabis business agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee,
volunteer, or agent of a cannabis business;
(5) "Cardholder" means:
(a) A registered qualified patient, designated caregiver, or visiting qualified
patient who has applied for, obtained, and possesses a valid registry
identification card issued by the cabinet; or
(b) A visiting qualified patient who has obtained and possesses:
1. A valid out-of-state registry identification card; and
2. Documentation of having been diagnosed with a qualifying medical
condition;
(6) "Cultivator" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090;
(7) "Cultivator agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer,
or agent of a cultivator;
(8) "Designated caregiver" means a person who has registered as such with the cabinet
under KRS 218B.055 and 218B.060;
(9) "Dispensary" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085,
and 218B.090;
(10) "Dispensary agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer,
or agent of a dispensary;
(11) "Disqualifying felony offense" means:
(a) A felony offense that resulted in the person being classified by the
Department of Corrections as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401; or
(b) A violation of a state or federal controlled substance law that was classified as
a felony in the jurisdiction where the person was convicted, except:
1. An offense for which the sentence, including any term of probation,
incarceration, or supervised release, was completed five (5) or more
Page 2 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
years earlier; or
2. An offense that, as determined by the cabinet, consisted of conduct for
which this chapter would likely have prevented a conviction, but the
conduct either occurred prior to the enactment of this chapter or was
prosecuted by an authority other than the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(12) "Enclosed, locked facility" means an indoor growing space such as a room,
greenhouse, building, or other indoor enclosed area that is maintained and operated
by a cultivator or producer and is equipped with locks and other security devices
that permit access only by authorized agents of the cultivator or producer, as
required by the cabinet;
(13) "Growth area" has the same meaning as an enclosed, locked facility;
(14) "Marijuana" has the same meaning as in KRS 218A.010;
(15) "Medicinal cannabis":
(a) Means marijuana as defined in KRS 218A.010 when cultivated, harvested,
processed, produced, transported, dispensed, distributed, sold, possessed, or
used in accordance with this chapter;
(b) Includes medicinal cannabis products and raw plant material; and
(c) Does not include industrial hemp or industrial hemp products as defined in
KRS 260.850;
(16) "Medicinal cannabis accessories" means any equipment, product, or material of any
kind which is used, intended for use, or designed for use in the preparing, storing,
using, or consuming medicinal cannabis in accordance with this chapter;
(17) "Medicinal cannabis practitioner" means a physician or an advanced practice
registered nurse who is authorized to prescribe controlled substances under KRS
314.042, who is authorized by his or her state licensing board to provide written
certifications pursuant to KRS 218B.050;
(18) "Medicinal cannabis product":
Page 3 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
(a) Means any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation
of any part of the plant Cannabis sp., its seeds or its resin; or any compound,
mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of these substances when
cultivated, harvested, processed, produced, transported, dispensed, distributed,
sold, possessed, or used in accordance with this chapter; and
(b) Does not include industrial hemp products as defined in KRS 260.850;
(19) "Minor" means a person less than eighteen (18) years of age;
(20) "Out-of-state registry identification card" means a registry identification card, or an
equivalent document, that was issued pursuant to the laws of another state, district,
territory, commonwealth, or insular possession of the United States;
(21) "Processor" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090;
(22) "Processor agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer, or
agent of a processor;
(23) "Producer" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080, 218B.085, and
218B.090;
(24) "Producer agent" means a principal officer, board member, employee, volunteer, or
agent of a producer;
(25) "Qualified patient" means a person who has obtained a written certification from a
medicinal cannabis practitioner with whom he or she has a bona fide practitioner-
patient relationship;
(26) "Qualifying medical condition" means any of the following:
(a) Acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS);
(b) Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS) or Lou Gehrig's disease;
(c) Cachexia or wasting syndrome;
(d) [Any type or form of ]Cancer regardless of type, form, or stage;
(e) Chronic nausea or cyclical vomiting syndrome that has proven resistant to
Page 4 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
other conventional medical treatments;
(f)[(b)] Chronic, severe, intractable, or debilitating pain;
(g) Crohn's disease;
(h)[(c)] Epilepsy or any other intractable seizure disorder;
(i) Fibromyalgia;
(j) Glaucoma;
(k) Hepatitis C;
(l) Human immunodeficiency virus (HIV);
(m) Huntington's disease;
(n)[(d)] Multiple sclerosis, muscle spasms, or spasticity;
(o) Muscular dystrophy;
(p) Neuropathies;
(q) Parkinson's disease;
[(e) Chronic nausea or cyclical vomiting syndrome that has proven resistant to
other conventional medical treatments;]
(r)[(f)] Post-traumatic stress disorder;[ and]
(s) Severe arthritis;
(t) Sickle cell disease;
(u) Any terminal illness as defined in KRS 217.5401; and
(v)[(g)] Any other medical condition or disease for which the Kentucky Center
for Cannabis established in KRS 164.983, or its successor, determines that
sufficient scientific data and evidence exists to demonstrate that an individual
diagnosed with that condition or disease is likely to receive medical,
therapeutic, or palliative benefits from the use of medicinal cannabis;
(27) "Raw plant material":
(a) Means the trichome-covered part of the female plant Cannabis sp. or any
mixture of shredded leaves, stems, seeds, and flowers of the Cannabis sp.
Page 5 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
plant; and
(b) Does not include plant material obtained from industrial hemp as defined in
KRS 260.850;
(28) "Registered qualified patient" means a qualified patient who has applied for,
obtained, and possesses a valid registry identification card issued by the cabinet;
(29) "Registry identification card" means a document issued by the cabinet that
identifies a person as a registered qualified patient, visiting qualified patient, or
designated caregiver;
(30) "Safety compliance facility" means an entity licensed as such under KRS 218B.080,
218B.085, and 218B.090;
(31) "Safety compliance facility agent" means a principal officer, board member,
employee, volunteer, or agent of a safety compliance facility;
(32) "Seedling" means a medicinal cannabis plant that has no flowers and is not taller
than eight (8) inches;
(33) "Serious violation" means:
(a) Any violation of this chapter or any administrative regulation promulgated
thereunder that is capable of causing death or which causes serious and
prolonged disfigurement, prolonged impairment of health, or prolonged loss
or impairment of the function of any bodily organ;
(b) The diversion of medicinal cannabis for use not regulated pursuant to this
chapter; or
(c) Any act that would constitute a violation of KRS 218A.1421;
(34) "Smoking" means the inhalation of smoke produced from the combustion of raw
plant material when ignited by a flame;
(35) "State licensing board" means:
(a) The Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure; or
(b) The Kentucky Board of Nursing;
Page 6 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
(36) "Telehealth" has the same meaning as in KRS 211.332;
(37) "Use of medicinal cannabis":
(a) Includes the acquisition, administration, possession, transfer, transportation,
or consumption of medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis accessories by a
cardholder in accordance with this chapter; and
(b) Does not include:
1. Cultivation of marijuana by a cardholder;
2. The use or consumption of marijuana by smoking; or
3. The use of industrial hemp or industrial hemp products as defined in
KRS 260.850;
(38) "Visiting qualified patient" means a person who has registered as such through the
cabinet as required under this chapter or who possesses a valid out-of-state registry
identification card and documentation of having been diagnosed with a qualifying
medical condition; and
(39) "Written certification" means a document dated and signed by a medicinal cannabis
practitioner, that:
(a) States, that in the medicinal cannabis practitioner's professional medical
opinion, the patient may receive medical, therapeutic, or palliative benefit
from the use of medicinal cannabis;
(b) Specifies the qualifying medical condition or conditions for which the
medicinal cannabis practitioner believes the patient may receive medical,
therapeutic, or palliative benefit; and
(c) Affirms that the medicinal cannabis practitioner has a bona fide practitioner-
patient relationship with the patient.
Section 2. KRS 218B.025 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A registered qualified patient, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section
and KRS 218B.035, shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to
Page 7 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
arrest, prosecution, or denial of any right or privilege, including but not limited to a
civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or professional
licensing board, for the use of medicinal cannabis, if the registered qualified patient
does not possess more than:
(a) An amount of medicinal cannabis determined by the cabinet to constitute an
uninterrupted thirty (30) day supply at his or her residence, except as
permitted under Section 7 of this Act;
(b) An amount of medicinal cannabis in excess of a thirty (30) day supply at his
or her residence, in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated
pursuant to KRS 218B.140(1)(c)6.; or
(c) An amount of medicinal cannabis determined by the cabinet to constitute an
uninterrupted ten (10) day supply on his or her person, except that an amount
greater than a ten (10) day supply may be transported by a registered qualified
patient from a dispensary to his or her residence if the medicinal cannabis is
contained in a sealed package that requires at least a two (2) step process for
initial opening.
(2) A registered qualified patient who is under eighteen (18) years of age shall not be
permitted to possess, purchase, or acquire medicinal cannabis and shall only engage
in the use of medicinal cannabis with the assistance of a designated caregiver who
is the registered qualified patient's parent or legal guardian responsible for
providing consent for medical treatment.
(3) A visiting qualified patient shall not be subject, under the laws of the
Commonwealth, to arrest, prosecution, or denial of any right or privilege, including
but not limited to civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or
professional licensing board, for the use of medicinal cannabis, if the visiting
qualified patient does not possess more than an amount of medicinal cannabis
determined by the cabinet to constitute an uninterrupted ten (10) day supply on his
Page 8 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
or her person.
(4) A designated caregiver shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth,
to arrest, prosecution, or denial of any right or privilege, including but not limited to
civil penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or professional
licensing board, for assisting a registered qualified patient to whom the designated
caregiver is connected through the cabinet's registration process with the use of
medicinal cannabis if the designated caregiver does not possess more than:
(a) An amount of medicinal cannabis determined by the cabinet to constitute an
uninterrupted thirty (30) day supply at his or her residence for each registered
qualified patient to whom the caregiver is connected through the cabinet's
registration process, except as permitted under Section 7 of this Act;
(b) An amount of medicinal cannabis in excess of a thirty (30) day supply at his
or her residence for each registered qualified patient to whom the caregiver is
connected through the cabinet's registration process, in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 218B.140(1)(c)6.; or
(c) An amount of medicinal cannabis determined by the cabinet to constitute an
uninterrupted ten (10) day supply on his or her person for each registered
qualified patient to whom the caregiver is connected through the cabinet's
registration process, except that an amount greater than a ten (10) day supply
may be transported by a designated caregiver from a dispensary to his or her
residence if the medicinal cannabis is contained in a sealed package that
requires at least a two (2) step process for initial opening.
(5) (a) All medicinal cannabis possessed by a cardholder outside of his or her
residence shall be kept in the original container in which the cardholder
received the medicinal cannabis from a dispensary.
(b) When a cardholder possesses medicinal cannabis outside of his or her
residence, the cardholder shall also be in possession of a valid registry
Page 9 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
identification card issued by the cabinet or, for visiting qualified patients, a
valid out-of-state registry identification card and documentation of having
been diagnosed with a qualifying medical condition.
(c) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to medicinal cannabis that
is the product of cultivation by a cardholder as permitted under Section 7 of
this Act.
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (1), (3), and (4) of this section and except as provided
in administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 218B.140(1)(c)6.:
(a) A registered qualified patient shall not be permitted to purchase more
medicinal cannabis than the amount determined by the cabinet to constitute an
uninterrupted thirty (30) day supply of medicinal cannabis during a given
twenty-five (25) day period;
(b) A designated caregiver shall not be permitted to purchase more medicinal
cannabis than the amount determined by the cabinet to constitute an
uninterrupted thirty (30) day supply of medicinal cannabis for each registered
qualified patient to whom the caregiver is connected through the cabinet's
registration process during a given twenty-five (25) day period; and
(c) A visiting qualified patient shall not be permitted to purchase more medicinal
cannabis than the amount determined by the cabinet to constitute an
uninterrupted ten (10) day supply of medicinal cannabis during a given eight
(8) day period.
(7) A cardholder shall not be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to arrest,
prosecution, or denial of any right or privilege, including but not limited to a civil
penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or professional licensing
board, for:
(a) Possession of cannabis that is incidental to the use of medicinal cannabis;
(b) Possession of medicinal cannabis accessories; or
Page 10 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
(c) Transferring medicinal cannabis to a safety facility for testing.
(8) No person shall be subject, under the laws of the Commonwealth, to arrest,
prosecution, or denial of any right or privilege, including but not limited to a civil
penalty or disciplinary action by a court or occupational or professional licensing
board, for:
(a) Selling medicinal cannabis accessories to a cardholder who is over eighteen
(18) years of age upon presentation of a valid registry identification card
issued by the cabinet or, for visiting qualified patients, a valid out-of-state
registry identification card and documentation of having been diagnosed with
a qualifying medical condition;
(b) Being in the presence or vicinity of the use of medicinal cannabis as allowed
under this chapter; or
(c) Assisting a registered qualified patient or visiting qualified patient with using
or administering medicinal cannabis. For purposes of illustration and not
limitation, this includes preparing raw plant material or brewing tea for a
registered qualified patient or visiting qualified patient. It does not include
providing medicinal cannabis to a patient that the patient did not already
possess.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a registered qualified
patient who is injured or defrauded, including by theft or deprivation of use and
benefit of any money, personal property including medicinal cannabis, or articles of
value of any kind, by his or her designated caregiver shall have a civil cause of
action in Circuit Court to recover the actual damages sustained, together with the
cost of the lawsuit, including a reasonable fee for the individual's attorney of record.
Section 3. KRS 218B.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any medicinal cannabis, medicinal cannabis accessories, lawful property, or
interest in lawful property that is possessed, owned, or used in connection
Page 11 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
with the use of medicinal cannabis or acts incidental to that use shall not be
subject to seizure or forfeiture under KRS 218A.405 to 218A.460.
(b) This chapter shall not prevent the seizure or forfeiture of marijuana exceeding
the amounts allowed under KRS 218B.025 and Section 7 of this Act or
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 218B.140(1)(c)6.,
nor shall it prevent seizure or forfeiture if the basis for that action is unrelated
to the use of medicinal cannabis in accordance with this chapter and any
administrative regulation promulgated thereunder.
(2) Possession of, or application for, a registry identification card, an out-of-state
registry identification card, or cannabis business license shall not constitute
probable cause or reasonable suspicion, nor shall it be used to support the search of
the person, property, or home of the person possessing or applying for the registry
identification card, out-of-state registry identification card, or cannabis business
license. The possession of, or application for, a registry identification card, out-of-
state registry identification card, or cannabis business license shall not preclude the
existence of probable cause if probable cause exists on other grounds.
(3) (a) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a cardholder is engaged in the
lawful use of medicinal cannabis, or in the case of a designated caregiver,
assisting with the lawful use of medicinal cannabis, if the cardholder:
1. Possesses a valid registry identification card or, in the case of a visiting
qualified patient, an out-of-state registry identification card and
documentation of having been diagnosed with a qualifying medical
condition; and
2. Possesses an amount of medicinal cannabis that does not exceed the
amount allowed under KRS 218B.025 or administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to KRS 218B.140(1)(c)6.
(b) This presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of evidence that
Page 12 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
conduct was unrelated to the use of medicinal cannabis or was otherwise in
violation of this chapter.
Section 4. KRS 218B.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not authorize any person to engage in, and shall not prevent the
imposition of any civil, criminal, or other penalties, including but not limited to
criminal prosecution or disciplinary action by the cabinet or an occupational or
professional licensing board, for engaging in the following conduct:
(a) Operating, navigating, or being in actual physical control of any aircraft,
vehicle, vessel, or any other device known, or hereafter invented, that is
powered by machinery and that is or may be used to transport persons or
property while under the influence of medicinal cannabis;
(b) Consuming medicinal cannabis while operating, navigating, or being in actual
physical control of an aircraft, vehicle, vessel, or any other device known, or
hereafter invented, that is powered by machinery and that is or may be used to
transport persons or property;
(c) Possessing medicinal cannabis that is within the operator's arm's reach or
requires less than a two (2) step process to access while operating, navigating,
or being in actual physical control of an aircraft, vehicle, vessel, or any other
device known, or hereafter invented, that is powered by machinery and that is
or may be used to transport persons or property;
(d) Undertaking any task under the influence of medicinal cannabis, when doing
so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice;
(e) Possessing medicinal cannabis, or otherwise engaging in the use of medicinal
cannabis:
1. On the grounds of any preschool or primary or secondary school, except
as permitted in accordance with policies enacted pursuant to KRS
218B.045(4);
Page 13 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
2. In any correctional facility; or
3. On any property of the federal government;
(f) Using marijuana, if that person is not a registered qualified patient or visiting
qualified patient;
(g) Using or consuming marijuana by smoking, except as permitted under
subsection (3) of this section;
(h) Using or consuming marijuana by vaping while on any form of public
transportation, in any public place as defined in KRS 525.010, or in any place
of public accommodation, resort, or amusement as defined in KRS 344.130;
or
(i) Cultivating marijuana unless that person is licensed by the cabinet as a
cannabis cultivator or cannabis producer pursuant to KRS 218B.080,
218B.085, and 218B.090 or is a cultivator or producer agent, except as
permitted in Section 7 of this Act.
(2) The penalty for a violation of subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section shall be the
same as those established for operating a motor vehicle under the influence of
alcohol or any other substance in KRS 189A.010.
(3) (a) An individual who violates subsection (1)(g) or (h) of this section shall not be
considered to be in possession of medicinal cannabis or engaged in the use of
medicinal cannabis and shall not benefit from the legal protections afforded
by this chapter.
(b) A registered qualified patient shall not be considered to be in violation of
subsection (1)(g) of this section if he or she uses or consumes medicinal
cannabis by smoking while on private property owned by the registered
qualified patient or his or her designated caregiver.
(c) The odor or smell of uncombusted raw plant material shall not constitute
evidence of use or consumption of cannabis by smoking.
Page 14 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
(d)[(c)] If an individual uses or consumes marijuana by smoking or vaping while
on any form of public transportation, in any public place as defined in KRS
525.010, or in any place of public accommodation, resort, or amusement as
defined in KRS 344.130:
1. The cabinet may revoke the individual's registry identification card; and
2. The individual may be subject to prosecution under KRS 218A.1421
and 218A.1422.
(4) Nothing in this chapter supersedes statutory laws relating to driving while under the
influence of intoxicants. This chapter shall not prevent the enforcement of current
laws pertaining to driving while intoxicated, including KRS 183.061, 189.520,
189A.010, and 235.240.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Aircraft" has the same meaning as in KRS 183.011;
(b) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as in KRS 189.010; and
(c) "Vessel" has the same meaning as in KRS 235.010.
Section 5. KRS 218B.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No person shall cultivate, except as permitted under Section 7 of this Act, process,
produce, possess, test, transfer, transport, or sell medicinal cannabis or otherwise
operate a cannabis business in this state without first obtaining a license under this
section.
(2) The cabinet shall create separate licenses, licensure application fees, initial
licensure fees, and licensure renewal fees allowing persons to operate a cannabis
business, pursuant to this chapter and any administrative regulations promulgated
thereunder, as a:
(a) Tier I cannabis cultivator;
(b) Tier II cannabis cultivator;
(c) Tier III cannabis cultivator;
Page 15 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
(d) Tier IV cannabis cultivator;
(e) Cannabis dispensary;
(f) Cannabis processor;
(g) Cannabis producer; or
(h) Cannabis safety compliance facility.
(3) Licensure application fees, initial licensing fees, and licensure renewal fees
collected by the cabinet pursuant to this section shall be retained by the cabinet for
administrative purposes.
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a cannabis business
shall be required to apply for and obtain from the cabinet a separate license
for each location it intends to operate.
(b) A cannabis business licensed as a producer may operate cultivation and
processing activities at separate locations, but shall not operate more than one
(1) cultivation and one (1) processing facility per license.
(5) (a) A cannabis business license issued under this section and KRS 218B.085 and
218B.090 shall be valid for one (1) year from the date of issuance. The
cabinet shall notify each licensee ninety (90) days prior to the date the license
expires to allow the licensee to begin the renewal process established by the
cabinet pursuant to KRS 218B.140.
(b) The renewal of a cannabis business license shall be contingent upon
successful achievement of minimal performance standards established by the
cabinet as part of the biennial accreditation process established by the cabinet
pursuant to KRS 218B.140.
(6) The cabinet shall approve a license holder's sale of a license issued pursuant to this
section and KRS 218B.085 and 218B.090 if the purchaser and any new facilities
meet the requirements of this chapter.
Section 6. KRS 218B.140 is amended to read as follows:
Page 16 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
(1) No later than July 1, 2024, the cabinet shall:
(a) Ensure that the electronic monitoring system established pursuant to KRS
218A.202 is designed or configured to enable:
1. Medicinal cannabis practitioners to record the issuance of written
certifications to qualified patients, as required by KRS 218B.050;
2. The cabinet and state licensing boards to monitor the issuance of written
certifications by medicinal cannabis practitioners;
3. Cabinet personnel, law enforcement personnel, and dispensary agents to
verify the validity of registry identification cards issued by the cabinet
by entering a registry identification number to determine whether or not
the identification number corresponds with a current, valid registry
identification card. The system shall only disclose whether the
identification card is valid and whether the cardholder is a registered
qualified patient, visiting qualified patient, or designated caregiver;
4. Law enforcement personnel and dispensary agents to access medicinal
cannabis sales data recorded by dispensary agents pursuant to KRS
218B.110;
5. Dispensary agents to record the amount of medicinal cannabis that is
dispensed to a cardholder during each transaction as required by KRS
218B.110; and
6. The sharing of dispensing data recorded by dispensary agents pursuant
to KRS 218B.110 with all dispensaries in real time;
(b) Ensure that the electronic monitoring system established pursuant to KRS
218A.202 is designed to facilitate the tracking of medicinal cannabis
cultivated, processed, or produced by a licensed cannabis business from the
point of cultivation to the point of sale to cardholders; and
(c) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
Page 17 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
to establish:
1. Procedures for the issuance, renewal, suspension, and revocation of
registry identification cards, including the creation of a standardized:
a. Written certification form; and
b. Application form which the cabinet shall require to be notarized;
2. Procedures for the issuance and revocation of registry identification
cards;
3. Procedures for the issuance, renewal, suspension, and revocation of
cannabis business licenses, including the creation of a uniform licensure
application form which the cabinet shall require to be notarized and
minimal performance standards for a biennial accreditation process with
all such procedures subject to the requirements of KRS Chapters 13A
and 13B;
4. A convenience fee to be assessed and collected by dispensaries for
visiting qualified patients who do not possess a valid registry
identification card issued by the cabinet and who purchase medicinal
cannabis with an out-of-state registry identification card and
documentation of having been diagnosed with a qualifying medical
condition. The convenience fee established pursuant to this
subparagraph shall not exceed fifteen dollars ($15) per transaction;
5. In collaboration with the Board of Physicians and Advisors:
a. A definition of the amount of medicinal cannabis or delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol that constitutes a daily supply, an
uninterrupted ten (10) day supply, and an uninterrupted thirty (30)
day supply of medicinal cannabis; and
b. The amount of raw plant material that medicinal cannabis products
are considered to be equivalent to;
Page 18 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
6. A process by which a medicinal cannabis practitioner may recommend,
and a registered qualified patient or his or her designated caregiver may
legally purchase and possess, an amount of medicinal cannabis in excess
of the thirty (30) day supply of medicinal cannabis, if the medicinal
cannabis practitioner reasonably believes that the standard thirty (30)
day supply would be insufficient in providing the patient with
uninterrupted therapeutic or palliative relief;
7. Provisions governing the following matters related to cannabis
businesses with the goal of protecting against diversion and theft,
without imposing any undue burden that would make cannabis business
operations unreasonable or impractical on cannabis businesses or
compromising the confidentiality of cardholders:
a. Recordkeeping and inventory control requirements, including the
use of the electronic monitoring systems established pursuant to
KRS 218A.202;
b. Procedures for the verification and validation of a registry
identification card, or its equivalent, that was issued pursuant to
the laws of another state, district, territory, commonwealth, or
insular possession of the United States that allows for the use of
medicinal cannabis in the jurisdiction of issuance;
c. Security requirements for safety compliance facilities, processors,
producers, dispensaries, and cultivators, which shall include at a
minimum lighting, video security, alarm requirements, on-site
parking, and measures to prevent loitering;
d. Procedures for the secure transportation, including delivery
services provided by dispensaries, and storage of medicinal
cannabis by cannabis business licensees and their employees or
Page 19 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
agents;
e. Employment and training requirements for licensees and their
agents, including requiring each licensee to create an identification
badge for each of the licensee's agents or employees; and
f. Restrictions on visits to licensed cultivation and processing
facilities, including requiring the use of visitor logs;
8. Procedures to establish, publish, and annually update a list of varieties
of cannabis that possess a low but effective level of
tetrahydrocannabinol, including the substance cannabidiol, by
comparing percentages of chemical compounds within a given variety
against other varieties of cannabis;
9. A rating system that tracks the terpene content of at least the twelve (12)
major terpenoids within each strain of cannabis available for medicinal
use within the Commonwealth;
10. Requirements for random sample testing of medicinal cannabis to
ensure quality control, including testing for cannabinoids, terpenoids,
residual solvents, pesticides, poisons, toxins, mold, mildew, insects,
bacteria, and any other dangerous adulterant;
11. Requirements for licensed cultivators, producers, and processors to
contract with an independent safety compliance facility to test the
medicinal cannabis before it is sold at a dispensary. The cabinet may
approve the safety compliance facility chosen by a cultivator, producer,
or processor and require that the safety compliance facility report test
results for a designated quantity of medicinal cannabis to the cultivator,
producer, or processor and cabinet;
12. Standards for the operation of safety compliance facilities which may
include:
Page 20 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
a. Requirements for equipment;
b. Personnel qualifications; and
c. Requiring facilities to be accredited by a relevant certifying entity;
13. Standards for the packaging and labeling of medicinal cannabis sold or
distributed by cannabis businesses which shall comply with 15 U.S.C.
secs. 1471 to 1476 and shall include:
a. Standards for packaging that requires at least a two (2) step
process of initial opening;
b. A warning label which may include the length of time it typically
takes for the product to take effect, how long the effects of the
product typically last, and any other information deemed
appropriate or necessary by the cabinet;
c. The amount of medicinal cannabis the product is considered the
equivalent to;
d. Disclosing ingredients, possible allergens, and certain bioactive
components, including cannabinoids and terpenoids, as determined
by the cabinet;
e. A nutritional fact panel;
f. Opaque, child-resistant packaging;
g. [A requirement that all raw plant material packaged or sold in this
state be marked or labeled as "NOT INTENDED FOR
CONSUMPTION BY SMOKING";
h. ]A requirement that medicinal cannabis products be clearly
marked with an identifiable and standardized symbol indicating
that the product contains cannabis;
h.[i.] A requirement that all medicinal cannabis product packaging
include an expiration date; and
Page 21 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
i.[j.] A requirement that medicinal cannabis products and their
packaging not be visually reminiscent of major brands of edible
noncannabis products or otherwise present an attractive nuisance
to minors;
14. Health and safety requirements for the processing of medicinal cannabis
and the indoor cultivation of medicinal cannabis by licensees;
15. Restrictions on:
a. Additives to medicinal cannabis that are toxic, including vitamin E
acetate, or increase the likelihood of addiction; and
b. Pesticides, fertilizers, and herbicides used during medicinal
cannabis cultivation which pose a threat to human health and
safety;
16. Standards for the safe processing of medicinal cannabis products created
by extracting or concentrating compounds from raw plant material;
17. Standards for determining the amount of unprocessed raw plant material
that medicinal cannabis products are considered the equivalent to;
18. Restrictions on advertising, marketing, and signage in regard to
operations or establishments owned by licensees necessary to prevent
the targeting of minors;
19. The requirement that evidence-based educational materials regarding
dosage and impairment be disseminated to registered qualified patients,
visiting qualified patients, and designated caregivers who purchase
medicinal cannabis products;
20. Policies governing insurance requirements for cultivators, dispensaries,
processors, producers, and safety compliance facilities; and
21. Standards, procedures, or restrictions that the cabinet deems necessary
to ensure the efficient, transparent, and safe operation of the medicinal
Page 22 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
cannabis program, except that the cabinet shall not promulgate any
administrative regulation that would impose an undue burden or make
cannabis business operations unreasonable or impractical.
(2) No later than January 1, 2025, the cabinet shall:
(a) Establish a medicinal cannabis adverse drug effects reporting system for the
purpose of allowing cardholders to report adverse drug effects via telephone
or online; and
(b) In collaboration with the Board of Physicians and Advisors, produce the
Medicinal Cannabis Advisory Pamphlet which shall include but not be limited
to:
1. Information on the risks, dangers, and possible side effects of the use of
medicinal cannabis;
2. Information on the medicinal cannabis adverse drug effects reporting
system and how to report adverse drug effects; and
3. A detachable signature page which shall be:
a. Signed by a cardholder each time he or she receives a copy of the
Medicinal Cannabis Advisory Pamphlet as required under KRS
218B.110(2)(d); and
b. Retained by the dispensary for a period of at least thirty-six (36)
months.
(3) The cabinet shall provide each licensed dispensary with an adequate number of
Medicinal Cannabis Advisory Pamphlets to ensure that the dispensary is able to
comply with the requirements of KRS 218B.110(2)(d).
(4) Except as provided in KRS 218B.035(1)(g), 218B.095(2)(b), 218.110(2)(e),
218B.115(2), 218B.120(3), and subsection (1)(c)10., 13., 15., and 16. of this
section, the cabinet shall not restrict or limit methods of delivery, use, or
consumption of medicinal cannabis or the types of products that may be acquired,
Page 23 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
produced, processed, possessed, sold, or distributed by a cannabis business.
(5) If a need for additional cannabis cultivation in this state is demonstrated by
cannabis businesses or the cabinet's own analysis, the cabinet may through the
promulgation of administrative regulations increase the cultivation area square
footage limits for either cultivators or producers, or both by up to three (3) times the
limits established in KRS 218B.105 and 218B.120. Any increase in the cultivation
square footage limits adopted by the cabinet pursuant to this section shall not result
in an increase in the licensure application or renewal fees established by the cabinet.
(6) When promulgating administrative regulations under this section, the cabinet shall
consider standards, procedures, and restrictions that have been found to be best
practices relative to the use and regulation of medicinal cannabis.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in addition to the
possession limits established in subsections (1)(a) and 4(a) of Section 2 of this
Act:
(a) 1. A registered qualified patient who is at least eighteen (18) years of age
shall be permitted to possess, cultivate, and harvest up to three (3)
mature medicinal cannabis plants and up to three (3) seedlings on
private property owned by the registered qualified patient.
2. A designated caregiver shall be permitted to possess, cultivate, and
harvest up to three (3) mature medicinal cannabis plants and up to
three (3) seedlings for each registered qualified patient to whom the
designated caregiver is connected through the cabinet's registration
process on private property owned by the designated caregiver; and
(b) Cardholders who possess, cultivate, and harvest mature medicinal cannabis
plants and seedlings shall be permitted to possess, on private property they
Page 24 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1303
own, any amount of raw plant material and medicinal cannabis products
resulting from at-home cultivation activities permitted under this section.
(2) Cardholders who wish to possess, cultivate, and harvest medicinal cannabis
plants and seedlings shall not be required under this chapter or by any
administrative regulation promulgated by the cabinet to register or otherwise
notify the cabinet of their intent to possess, cultivate, and harvest medicinal
cannabis plants and seedlings on private property they own.
(3) Mature medicinal cannabis plants and seedlings possessed, cultivated, and
harvested by cardholders shall be stored in an enclosed, locked space such as a
closet, room, greenhouse, or other indoor locked space located on private
property owned by the cardholder.
(4) The concentration and potency limits for commercially available medicinal
cannabis established in KRS 218B.095, 218B.110, 218B.115, and 218B.120 shall
not apply to raw plant material or medicinal cannabis products resulting from at-
home cultivation activities permitted under this section.
(5) (a) Except for a designated caregiver who may provide medicinal cannabis to a
registered qualified patient to whom they are connected through the
cabinet's registration process, nothing in this section shall be interpreted as
authorizing or otherwise permitting a cardholder to transfer or sell
medicinal cannabis, mature medicinal cannabis plants, or seedlings to
another individual including another cardholder.
(b) A cardholder who transfers or sells medicinal cannabis, mature medicinal
cannabis plants, or seedlings to another individual in violation of paragraph
(a) of this subsection, may be subject to prosecution including under KRS
218A.1421.
Page 25 of 25
XXXX 1/30/2025 11:06 AM Jacketed